Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.060

Axle.

"Axle" means structure or structures in the same or approximately the same transverse plane with a vehicle supported by wheels and on which or with which such wheels revolve.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.060. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 7; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]